Missouri, session 2026, HB3416.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.534, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 160.534 and 173.1030, to read as follows:
160.534. For fiscal year 1996 and each subsequent fiscal year, any amount of the
excursion gambling boat proceeds deposited in the gaming proceeds for education fund in
excess of the [amount] amounts transferred to the school district bond fund as provided in
section 164.303 and the strengthening HBCUs fund as provided in section 173.1030 shall
be transferred to the classroom trust fund. Such moneys shall be distributed in the manner
provided in section 163.043.
173.1030. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Strengthening
HBCUs Act".
2. As used in this section, the term "historically black colleges and universities"
or "HBCUs" means institutions eligible to receive grant awards under the federal
Strengthening Historically Black Colleges and Universities Program created under 20
U.S.C. Section 1060 et seq., as determined under 34 CFR 608.2.
3. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Strengthening HBCUs
Fund", which shall consist of moneys transferred to the fund as provided in subsection 4
of this section and any gifts, contributions, grants, or donations received from federal,
private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3416 2
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in
this fund shall be used solely as provided in subsection 5 of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. (1) One percent of all excursion gambling boat proceeds shall be transferred
to the strengthening HBCUs fund from the gaming proceeds for education fund created
in section 313.822 before any amounts in the gaming proceeds for education fund are
transferred to the school district bond fund as provided in section 164.303 or the
classroom trust fund as provided in section 160.534.
(2) One percent of all net proceeds received from the Missouri state lottery after
payment of prizes and administrative expenses shall be transferred to the strengthening
HBCUs fund from the lottery proceeds fund created in Article III, Section 39(b) of the
Constitution of Missouri before any amounts in the lottery proceeds fund are
transferred for any other purpose.
5. Moneys in the strengthening HBCUs fund shall stand appropriated without
further legislative action to all historically black colleges and universities in this state on
an equal basis to be used solely for:
(1) A capital project for which financing is permitted under the federal HBCU
Capital Financing Program, as determined under 20 U.S.C. Section 1066a(5); or
(2) Any activity for which a grant award is permitted under the federal
Strengthening Historically Black Colleges and Universities Program, as determined
under 20 U.S.C. Section 1062.
6. Nothing in this section requires historically black colleges and universities to
have obtained federal funding under a program named in this section in order to receive
and expend the funds appropriated to them.
7. Funding authorized under this section shall be used to supplement, not
supplant, the level of funding historically black colleges and universities received under
appropriations made for fiscal year 2027.
✔